District of Columbia statutes.
38-402

Control of school construction and repairs.

The Director of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs (“Director”) shall have the same authority, control over, and supervision of the construction or repair of a public school building as the Director has of the construction or repair of any privately owned building.

History

Mar. 3, 1879, 20 Stat. 408, ch. 182
June 22, 1990, D.C. Law 8-143, § 4, 37 DCR 2972

Cross References

Minor repairs by janitors, see § 38-903.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-202.
1973 Ed., § 31-803.